California statutes. Education Code
 If a campus has an existing center or office that supports parenting students and a student may be better served by that center or office, the Basic Needs Center may direct that student to the student parent center or office. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their campus financial aid department or financial aid office. This section does not require nor encourage the Basic Needs Center to be combined or colocated with the financial aid department or financial aid office. The funding made available by the Budget Act of 2021 to implement this section, or any subsequent Budget Act or statute to implement this section, shall not be used to combine or colocate the Basic Needs Center with the financial aid department or financial aid office and shall not be used for the administration of student financial aid programs, including staffing. Each Basic Needs Center shall connect students to the financial aid department or financial aid
 office, as
 appropriate, to ensure that students are receiving all available financial aid, including supplemental awards such as the awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their local homelessness response system to refer students to community resources available to address homelessness in addition to services and resources provided by the campus. Basic Needs Centers may provide support to students who can be reasonably expected to enroll in the upcoming term and to provide support to students during summer and winter breaks who were previously enrolled or are enrolled for the upcoming fall or spring term.

(C) Campuses shall endeavor, to the extent feasible, to use a portion of any funds made available for basic needs support for providing funds directly to students to address urgent needs. To the extent that a Basic Needs Center is already in place, that center may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section. If the existing Basic Needs Center fulfills only part of the requirements of this section, basic needs services and resources shall be expanded as needed to satisfy all the requirements of this section.

(D) The childcare services and resources a Basic Needs Center may provide for parenting students includes, but is not limited to, direct financial or service support.

(3) (A) No
 later than February 1, 2022, develop a document that shall be provided to students at the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), in either electronic format or paper form, and that shall be made available to students online, that clearly lists on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The description of the service or resource.

(ii) The location of where the service or resource is provided.

(iii) The point of contact for the service or resource, including a name, telephone number, and email address.

(iv) Any eligibility restrictions on accessing the service or resource.

(B) On or before
 September 1, 2025, update the document developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to include in the list of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service’s “SNAP Retail Locator” internet website link, which contains a map with locations that are authorized retail food stores under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and accept the use of electronic benefits transfer cards issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) Provide the document to students as a part of campus orientations in either electronic format or paper form.

(D) Provide to faculty the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), and the contact
 information for the coordinator, once designated pursuant to paragraph (1), and encourage faculty to include the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, and the contact information for the coordinator in their syllabi.

(E) To ensure that the document remains useful to students, the document shall be reviewed, updated, and made available online on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution, as specified in paragraph (6), no later than the first day of every fall and spring semester or no later than the first day of every fall and spring quarter.

(4) No later than February 1, 2022, streamline the application and intake process for on-campus basic needs services and resources to minimize duplication
 and eliminate barriers to access. If an application is required, develop and use a single application for students to receive on-campus basic needs services and resources.

(5) No later than February 1, 2022, develop and implement a plan to identify and provide outreach to students, including nontraditional students, who have basic needs insecurity related to housing, food, and mental health. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), the outreach shall include information about the coordinator and the Basic Needs Center.

(6) No later than February 1, 2022, provide a student basic needs tab that is clearly visible and easily accessible from a drop-down menu on the home page of the campus’ internet website and include the information described in paragraph (3) conspicuously on both the internet
 website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), information about the coordinator and Basic Needs Center shall also be included on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution.

(7) (A) For the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, provide classified employees with access to food pantry services offered by the Basic Needs Center.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to redirect funding in
 the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years from the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 to support the activities described in subparagraph (A). 

(c) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges information that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The description and number of basic needs services and resources, broken down by category.

(B) The number of students served by the basic needs services and resources.

(C) Any existing and available
 data regarding the socioeconomic and demographic backgrounds of these students.

(D) Challenges and best practices in the implementation of the basic needs services and resources.

(E) Whether students who used the basic needs services and resources remained enrolled or graduated from that campus.

(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the previous year and the total number of students in the previous year who received CalFresh benefits, as provided by the State Department of Social Services.

(G) Whether the campus has a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program for the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits,
 or efforts underway to enact such an agreement.

(2) The data and information reported under this subdivision shall be disaggregated by each basic needs service and resource, where applicable.

(3) Campuses are encouraged to collaborate with the State Department of Social Services to obtain the data identified in paragraph (1), as applicable.

(4) The data and information reported by each campus of the California Community Colleges for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include both of the following for the applicable reporting period:

(A) The number of classified employees served pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of
 subdivision (b).

(B) If appropriate, whether the use of food pantry services by classified employees pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) impacted resources available to students. 

(d) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop and submit to the Governor and the Legislature every year beginning on or before May 1, 2023, a report based on the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) and information on the use of funds made available from the Budget Act of 2022 to implement this section.

(2) A legislative report that includes the information required to be reported in this subdivision and submitted in
 any of the years required by paragraph (1) shall fulfill the reporting requirement pursuant to this subdivision to reduce duplicative efforts.

(3) The reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) for the appropriate reporting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 148)   Effective October 13, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 11 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 745.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: 

(1) “CalFresh program” means the program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “FAFSA” means the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.

(3) “Independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as defined in Section 66010.

(4) “Private postsecondary educational institution” has the same meaning as defined in Section 94858.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify educational policies for purposes of addressing student hunger on campus by ensuring low-income students have equitable access to nutritious and sufficient food sources by improving access for low-income students to the CalFresh program.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify the United States Department of Education’s Dear Colleague Letter GEN-22-02 issued on January 20, 2022, to ensure that California institutions of higher education are increasing awareness of available benefits for students to use to reduce hunger on campus and to ensure continued enrollment. 

(d) For purposes of Section 273.5(a) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a student shall be determined to be attending at least one-half time any semester or term in which the student enrolls in at least one-half of the number of
 credits needed each semester or term to graduate within four years of enrollment as a first-time freshmen or within two years of enrollment as a transfer student, unless prohibited by federal law.

(e) (1) Each campus of the California State University and each community college district shall use FAFSA data to identify students who meet the income qualifications for the CalFresh program.

(2) (A) Each campus of the California State University and each community college district shall send an email to the campus-based email account associated with a student identified pursuant to paragraph (1) informing the student that they may qualify for the CalFresh program if the student can also meet one of the exemptions for the CalFresh
 student eligibility rules provided for in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(B) The email described in subparagraph (A) shall encourage the student to contact the local county welfare agency to apply for the CalFresh program and include the contact information for the local county welfare agency and the designated campus staff who can assist the student in applying for the CalFresh program.

(f) (1) Each campus of the University of California, each independent institution of higher education, and each private postsecondary educational institution is encouraged to use FAFSA data to identify students who meet the income qualifications for the CalFresh program.

(2) (A) Each campus of the University of California, each independent institution of
 higher education, and each private postsecondary educational institution is encouraged to send an email to the campus-based email account associated with a student identified pursuant to paragraph (1) informing the student that they may qualify for the CalFresh program if the student can also meet one of the exemptions for the CalFresh student eligibility rules provided for in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the email described in subparagraph (A) encourage the student to contact the local county welfare agency to apply for the CalFresh program and include the contact information for the local county welfare agency and the designated campus staff who can assist the student in applying for the CalFresh program.

(g) For purposes of Section 483(a)(3)(E) of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended by Section 1090(a)(3)(E) of Title 20 of the United States Code, FAFSA data shall be used in accordance with federal law and for purposes of this section shall only be used to inform students of their potential CalFresh program eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 934, Sec. 1.   (AB 2810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.8.

(a) The Wellness Vending Machine Pilot Program is hereby established. The California State University and the California Community Colleges shall administer the pilot program at their segments of public postsecondary education.

(b) (1) The California State University shall select five campuses, that are deemed most appropriate, to participate in the pilot program. Each participating campus shall establish at the main campus, a satellite campus, or both, at least one wellness vending machine that dispenses wellness products, including, but not limited to, condoms, dental dams, menstrual cups, lubrication, tampons, menstrual pads, pregnancy tests, and
 nonprescription
 drugs, including discounted emergency contraception.

(2) Each participating campus shall do both of the following:

(A) To the extent possible, place wellness vending machines in central locations on campus that will enable students to have access 24 hours per day, seven days per week.

(B) Select and implement at least one of the following methods, or other chosen method, to notify students of the presence of the wellness vending machine:

(i) Pamphlets.

(ii) Posters.

(iii) Flyers.

(iv) Social media.

(v) Creating or updating internet websites.

(vi) Hosting a grand opening event.

(vii) Outreach to campus clubs and organizations.

(viii) During an orientation session.

(3) On or after July 1, 2025, and on or after each July 1, the California State University shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the pilot project at its participating campuses. Information reported pursuant to this paragraph shall be disaggregated by
 campus, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The location of the wellness vending machine.

(B) Which times of the day and days of the week the wellness vending machine is stocked, functioning, and accessible to students.

(C) The total cost to acquire and maintain the wellness vending machine.

(D) Which method or methods were used to notify students of the presence of the wellness vending machine as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(E) The types of products offered through the wellness vending machine.

(F) Whether the price for each type of product was offered at a discounted rate as compared to the average retail price.

(G) The total sales volume, disaggregated by type of product.

(H) The name of each entity or organization, if any, the campus or segment partnered with to offer products through the wellness vending machine.

(I) The source or sources of funding used to finance the wellness vending machine.

(c) (1) The California Community Colleges shall select five community colleges, that are deemed most appropriate, to participate in the pilot program. Participation of community colleges shall be voluntary. Each
 participating community college shall establish at the main campus, a satellite campus, or both, at least one wellness vending machine that dispenses wellness products, including, but not limited to, condoms, dental dams, menstrual cups, lubrication, tampons, menstrual pads, pregnancy tests, and nonprescription drugs, including discounted emergency contraception.

(2) Each participating community college shall do both of the following:

(A) To the extent possible, place wellness vending machines in central locations on campus that will enable students to have access 24 hours per day, seven days per week.

(B) Select and implement at least one of the following methods, or other chosen method, to notify students of the
 presence of the wellness vending machine:

(i) Pamphlets.

(ii) Posters.

(iii) Flyers.

(iv) Social media.

(v) Creating or updating internet websites.

(vi) Hosting a grand opening event.

(vii) Outreach to campus clubs and organizations.

(viii) During an orientation session.

(3) On or after July 1, 2025, and on or after each July 1 thereafter, the
 California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the pilot project at its participating community colleges. Information reported pursuant to this paragraph shall be disaggregated by community
 college, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The location of the wellness vending machine.

(B) Which times of the day and days of the week the wellness vending machine is stocked, functioning, and accessible to students.

(C) The total cost to acquire and maintain the wellness vending machine.

(D) Which method or methods were used to notify students of the presence of the wellness vending machine as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(E) The types of products offered through the wellness vending machine.

(F) Whether the price for each type of product was offered at a discounted rate as compared to the average retail price.

(G) The total sales volume, disaggregated by type of product.

(H) The name of each entity or organization, if any, the campus or segment partnered with to offer products through the wellness vending machine.

(I) The source or sources of funding used to finance the wellness vending machine.

(d) (1) The University of California is requested to select any number of campuses, that are deemed most appropriate, to participate in the pilot program. Each participating campus is requested to establish at
 the main campus, a satellite campus, or both, at least one wellness vending machine that dispenses wellness products, including, but not limited to, condoms, dental dams, menstrual cups, lubrication, tampons, menstrual pads, pregnancy tests, and nonprescription drugs, including discounted emergency contraception.

(2) Each participating campus is requested to do both of the following:

(A) To the extent possible, place wellness vending machines in central locations on campus that will enable students to have access 24 hours per day, seven days per week.

(B) Select and implement at least one of the following methods, or other chosen method, to notify students of the presence of the wellness vending machine:

(i) Pamphlets.

(ii) Posters.

(iii) Flyers.

(iv) Social media.

(v) Creating or updating internet websites.

(vi) Hosting a grand opening event.

(vii) Outreach to campus clubs and organizations.

(viii) During an orientation session.

(3) On or after July 1, 2025, and on or after each July 1 thereafter, the University of California is requested to submit a report
 to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the pilot project at its participating campuses. Information reported pursuant to this paragraph shall be disaggregated by
 campus, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The location of the wellness vending machine.

(B) Which times of the day and days of the week the wellness vending machine is stocked, functioning, and accessible to students.

(C) The total cost to acquire and maintain the wellness vending machine.

(D) Which method or methods were used to notify students of the presence of the wellness vending machine as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(E) The types of products offered through the wellness vending machine.

(F) Whether the price for each type of product was offered at a discounted rate as compared to the average retail price.

(G) The total sales volume, disaggregated by type of product.

(H) The name of each entity or organization, if any, the campus or segment partnered with to offer products through the wellness vending machine.

(I) The source or sources of funding used to finance the wellness vending machine.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 933, Sec. 1.   (AB 2482)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Basic needs” has the same meaning as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 66023.4.

(2) “Homeless” and “housing insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, or who are at imminent risk of losing housing. This includes students who are any of the following:

(A) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason.

(B) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping
 grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations.

(C) Living in emergency or transitional shelters.

(D) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(E) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings.

(3) “Mental health” means services and resources to address the signs and symptoms of mental health challenges. Depending on student age and developmental level, this may include, but is not limited to, conditions such as depression, suicidal thoughts and behaviors, schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, substance use conditions, eating disorders, and
 anxiety, including post-traumatic stress disorder.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding appropriated to the University of California and the California State University specifically for rapid rehousing, basic needs, and student mental health be used for the purposes described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, for all of the following:

(1) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for rapid rehousing may be used to support efforts to assist homeless and housing insecure students, including, but not limited to, all of the following purposes:

(A) For campuses to establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations
 experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for students.

(B) To connect students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources.

(C) To establish ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources.

(D) To provide emergency grants necessary to secure housing, to prevent the imminent loss of housing, or to stabilize housing for students at risk of homelessness.

(2) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for basic needs are used to support, but are not limited to supporting, meal donation programs, food pantries serving students,
 CalFresh enrollment, and other means of directly providing nutrition assistance to students, and may be used, but are not limited to being used, for all of the following purposes:

(A) To assist homeless and housing insecure students in securing and maintaining stable housing.

(B) To supply students with personal hygiene products.

(C) To establish Basic Needs Centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on-campus and off-campus resources to support timely program completion. Basic Needs Centers may use funds described in this paragraph for its operations.

(D) To designate or hire dedicated Basic Needs Coordinators for the Basic Needs Centers who will serve as a
 single point of contact for students.

(3) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for student mental health are used to increase mental health resources for students, including, but not limited to, the expansion, continuation, and support of existing campus-based mental health programs and services.

(c) Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section that are to be provided to students shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section shall be allocated to University of California and California State University campuses based on demonstrated need.

(d) The
 University of California and the California State University shall each report annually on or before February 1 on the use of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for the two preceding fiscal years. Reporting on the use of all funds appropriated specifically for purposes of this section may be included in a single report if all data elements required pursuant to this section are separately identifiable. A report described in this subdivision shall be submitted to the Director of Finance and the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and shall include all of the following:

(1) For funds appropriated for rapid rehousing, the University of California and the California State University shall report information that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of professional staff
 and full-time employees that assist students with rapid rehousing.

(B) The number of students served by campus.

(C) The allocation of funds by campus.

(D) A description of the types of programs funded.

(E) Whether students receiving rapid rehousing support remained enrolled at the university or graduated.

(F) Other relevant outcomes.

(2) For funds appropriated for basic needs and student mental health, the University of California and the California State University shall report information that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The
 amount of funds allocated to each campus.

(B) For each campus that was allocated funds, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The programmatic budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section.

(C) A description of the types of programs in which each campus spent the funds.

(D) A list of campuses that accept, or plan to accept, electronic benefits transfer.

(E) A list of campuses that participate, or plan to participate, in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program.

(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding fiscal year and the
 total number of students in the preceding fiscal year that received CalFresh benefits.

(G) A list of campuses that have a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program to identify new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, and a list of campuses with ongoing efforts to enter into such an agreement.

(H) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing.

(I) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received.

(J) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments.

(K) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student.

(L) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services.

(M) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio.

(N) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers.

(3) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing insecurity, food insecurity, and student mental health.

(4) An analysis describing how funds appropriated specifically for
 purposes of this section reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion.

(5) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 4.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66024.

The Legislature hereby affirms its commitment to the continuing quality and development of graduate and professional programs of the University of California, the California State University, and the independent institutions of higher education in this state.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each governing board of an institution of higher education periodically review the quality of the graduate and professional programs operated by the institution, and the need to add, discontinue, or enhance graduate and professional programs, including programs leading to the joint doctorate degree. 

It is further the intent of the Legislature that the development of joint doctoral programs operated by the California State University and the University of California or one or more accredited independent institutions of higher education be established and expedited. 

All graduate and professional programs, including joint doctoral programs, are expected to undergo careful evaluation and be approved only when it has been demonstrated that these programs meet the needs of students and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

66024.5.

(a) This section shall apply to all segments of postsecondary education in this state.

(b) Except for purposes of an application for a professional degree or law enforcement basic training courses and programs, a postsecondary educational institution shall not inquire about a prospective student’s criminal history on an initial application form or at any time during the admissions process before the institution’s final decision relative to the prospective student’s application for admission.

(c) A postsecondary educational institution shall make any necessary changes to its application form to comply
 with subdivision (b) by the fall term of the 2021–22 academic year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 4.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.

(a) Systemwide fees charged to resident undergraduate students at the University of California and the California State University shall be reduced for the 1998–99 fiscal year by 5 percent below the level charged during the 1997–98 fiscal year, and the systemwide fees charged to those students for the 1999–2000 fiscal year shall be reduced by 5 percent below the level charged during the 1998–99 fiscal year. Systemwide education and registration fees charged to resident graduate students at the University of California and the California State University for the 1999–2000 fiscal year shall be reduced by 5 percent below the level charged those resident students for the 1997–98 fiscal year. This subdivision does not apply to resident students pursuing a course of study leading to a professional degree who are subject to a supplemental fee pursuant to the policy of the University of California.

(b) No provision of this section shall apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective July 6, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 76300, a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges shall not charge any mandatory systemwide tuition or fees, including enrollment fees, registration fees, differential fees, or incidental fees, to any of the following:

(1) A dependent eligible to receive assistance under Article 2 (commencing with Section 890) of Chapter 4 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(2) (A) Any child of any veteran of the United States military who has a service-connected disability, has been killed in service, or has died of a service-connected disability, where the annual income of the child,
 including the value of any support received from a parent, does not exceed the state poverty level as defined in subdivision (d).

(B) Notwithstanding Section 893 of the Military and Veterans Code, the Department of Veterans Affairs may determine the eligibility for fee waivers for a child described in subparagraph (A).

(3) A dependent, or a surviving spouse who has not remarried, of any member of the California National Guard who, in the line of duty, and while in the active service of the state, was killed, died of a disability resulting from an event that occurred while in the active service of the state, or is permanently disabled as a result of an event that occurred while in the active service of the state. For the purposes of this paragraph, “active service of the state” refers to a member of the California National Guard activated pursuant to Section 146 of the Military and
 Veterans Code.

(4) (A) An undergraduate student who is a recipient of a Medal of Honor, commonly known as a Congressional Medal of Honor, or an undergraduate student who is a child of a recipient of a Medal of Honor and who is no more than 27 years old, if both of the following requirements are met:

(i) The undergraduate student’s annual income, including the value of any support received from a parent, does not exceed the state poverty level as defined in subdivision (d).

(ii) The recipient of the Medal of Honor who is or was the parent of the undergraduate student is, or at the time of the recipient’s death was, a California resident as determined pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41.

(B) The
 Department of Veterans Affairs shall determine the eligibility of any applicant for a fee waiver under this paragraph.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 76300, a campus of the University of California or the California State University shall not charge any mandatory systemwide tuition or fees, including enrollment fees, registration fees, differential fees, or incidental fees, to a current or former foster youth, if the current or former foster youth meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Is 25 years of age or younger.

(B) Has been in foster care for at least 12 consecutive months after reaching 10 years of age.

(C) Meets any of the following:

(i) Is under a current
 foster care placement order by the juvenile court.

(ii) Was under a foster care placement order by the juvenile court upon reaching 18 years of age.

(iii) Was adopted, or entered guardianship, from foster care.

(D) Completes and submits the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA).

(E) Maintains a minimum grade point average and meets other conditions necessary for the student to be in good standing at the public postsecondary educational institution that the current or former foster youth attends, as determined by the appropriate public postsecondary segment.

(F) Meets the financial need requirements established for Cal Grant A awards under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section
 69430) of Part 42.

(2) A student shall not have the student’s mandatory systemwide tuition or fees waived pursuant to this subdivision in excess of the equivalent of attendance in a four-year undergraduate program.

(3) The amount of a student’s tuition or fee waiver pursuant to this subdivision shall be reduced by any state or federal financial aid, including scholarships or grants, received by the student for the academic year or semester, or the equivalent, in which the student receives the tuition or fee waiver pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) A person who is eligible for a waiver of tuition or fees under this section may receive a waiver for each academic year during which the person applies for that waiver, but an eligible person may not receive a waiver of tuition or fees for a prior academic year.

(d) As used in this section, the “state poverty level” means annual household income that is less than the amount calculated for a single person with no dependents pursuant to Section 18501 of the Revenue and Tax Code.

(e) The waiver of tuition or fees under this section shall apply only to a person who is determined to be a resident of California pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41.

(f) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a dependent of a veteran within the meaning of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 890 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(g) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution,
 make a provision applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   (AB 1745)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.7.
